New Jersey, session 221, A220.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  a.  The Department of Transportation shall not plan for, design, or construct, or use funds for the planning, design, or construction of, a rock wall between milepost 1.00 and milepost 1.50 on Interstate Highway Route 80. b.    For any departmental project for rock fall mitigation between milepost 1.00 and milepost 1.50 on Interstate Highway Route 80, the department shall conduct a full analysis of all feasible options for rock fall mitigation, provided that any such option shall not include the construction of a rock wall. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.